Maine, session 132, LD1012.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA c. 421 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 421
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE COOPERATIVE EXTENSION TICK LABORATORY
OPERATIONS FUND
§2481. Fund established
The University of Maine Cooperative Extension Tick Laboratory Operations Fund,
referred to in this chapter as "the fund," is established. The fund consists of revenues
received pursuant to Title 8, section 374, subsection 6 and any funds received as
contributions from private and public sources. The fund must be held separate and apart
from all other money, funds and accounts. Eligible investment earnings credited to the
assets of the fund become part of the assets of the fund. Any balance remaining in the fund
at the end of any fiscal year must be carried forward to the next fiscal year. The fund is
administered by the University of Maine Cooperative Extension.
§2482. Expenditures from fund; distribution
Funds in the fund must be distributed as provided under this section.
1. Funds received from State. All funds received from the State dedicated to the
fund must be expended on the operations of the University of Maine Cooperative Extension
tick laboratory or successor laboratory, including, but not limited to, supplies, educational
materials development, salaries, equipment and travel.
2. Funds received from private or public sources. All funds received from private
or public sources that were directed to the fund by the donating source must be spent on
the operations of the University of Maine Cooperative Extension tick laboratory or
Page 1 - 132LR1367(06)

successor laboratory, including, but not limited to, supplies, educational materials
development, salaries, equipment and travel.
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §374, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Tick laboratory lottery game. No later than July 1, 2026, the commission, in
consultation with the University of Maine Cooperative Extension, shall develop and initiate
a tick laboratory instant lottery game designed to raise funds for the University of Maine
Cooperative Extension Tick Laboratory Operations Fund established in Title 7, section
2481. Tickets for the instant lottery game established under this subsection must be sold
for $4 and must be changed by the commission periodically throughout the year. The
commission shall annually provide 20% of the net proceeds of the lottery game established
in accordance with this subsection to the University of Maine Cooperative Extension Tick
Laboratory Operations Fund and 80% to the General Fund.
Sec. 3. 8 MRSA §387, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 1995, c. 494, §5, is further
amended to read:
C. For payment to the General Fund; and
Sec. 4. 8 MRSA §387, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. B, §18 and
affected by c. 614, §9, is further amended to read:
D. For payment to the Maine Outdoor Heritage Fund pursuant to Title 12, section
10302.; and
Sec. 5. 8 MRSA §387, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. For payment to the University of Maine Cooperative Extension Tick Laboratory
Operations Fund pursuant to Title 7, section 2481.
Sec. 6. Report. By December 15, 2028, the State Liquor and Lottery Commission
shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over lottery matters detailing the status of the tick laboratory instant lottery game
established pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 8, section 374, subsection 6,
including revenues received by the General Fund and the University of Maine Cooperative
Extension Tick Laboratory Operations Fund established in Title 7, section 2481. The joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over lottery matters may report
out legislation related to the report to the 134th Legislature in 2029.
Sec. 7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
University of Maine Cooperative Extension Tick Laboratory Operations Fund N532
Initiative: Provides allocations to authorize expenditures of funds received from the tick
laboratory lottery game.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $108,623
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $108,623
Page 2 - 132LR1367(06)